test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-lex_herkki_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - herkki: # MLO, checked
    herkki+A+Attr: herkis
    herkki+A+Sg+Nom: herkki
    herkki+A+Sg+Gen: heerki
    herkki+A+Sg+Acc: heerki
    herkki+A+Sg+Ill: hiärkán
    herkki+A+Sg+Loc: heerkist
    herkki+A+Sg+Com: herkkijn
    herkki+A+Sg+Abe: herkittáá
    herkki+A+Ess: herkkin
    herkki+A+Par: herkkid
    herkki+A+Pl+Nom: heerkih
    herkki+A+Pl+Gen: [heerkij, herkij]
    herkki+A+Pl+Acc: heerkijd
    herkki+A+Pl+Ill: herkkijd
    herkki+A+Pl+Loc: heerkijn
    herkki+A+Pl+Com: [herkijguin, herkijgijn]
    herkki+A+Pl+Abe: herkijttáá

    herkki+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: heerkib
    herkki+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: heerkib
    herkki+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: heerkib
    herkki+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: herkibân
    herkki+A+Comp+Sg+Loc: herkibist
    herkki+A+Comp+Sg+Com: herkibáin
    herkki+A+Comp+Sg+Abe: heerkibttáá
    herkki+A+Comp+Ess: herkibin
    herkki+A+Comp+Par: herkibid
    herkki+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: herkibeh
    herkki+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: herkibij
    herkki+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: herkibijd
    herkki+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: herkibáid
    herkki+A+Comp+Pl+Loc: herkibijn
    herkki+A+Comp+Pl+Com: [herkibijguin, herkibijgijn]
    herkki+A+Comp+Pl+Abe: herkibijttáá

    herkki+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: herkimus
    herkki+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: herkimuu
    herkki+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: herkimuu
    herkki+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: herkimusân
    herkki+A+Superl+Sg+Loc: herkimuust
    herkki+A+Superl+Sg+Com: herkimuin
    herkki+A+Superl+Sg+Abe: herkimuuttáá
    herkki+A+Superl+Ess: herkimussân
    herkki+A+Superl+Par: herkimussâd
    herkki+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: herkimuuh
    herkki+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: herkimui
    herkki+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: herkimuid
    herkki+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: herkimuid
    herkki+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: herkimuin
    herkki+A+Superl+Pl+Com: [herkimuiguin, herkimuigijn]
    herkki+A+Superl+Pl+Abe: herkimuittáá
